Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-609
Student identification cards; requirements.

Beginning with the 2022-23 academic year, each public postsecondary institution authorized to operate in this state shall require that the telephone number for a national suicide prevention hotline, a local suicide prevention hotline, or a crisis text line is printed on each new student identification card issued to a student enrolled in such public postsecondary institution. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the issuance of student identification cards to students in any postsecondary institution.

Laws 2021, LB528, § 69.